Hawaii statutes.
§174-16 Consideration of petitions; notice
and hearing. When more than one petition is filed covering portions of the
same territory, the board of land and natural resources may consolidate the
petitions. Having received the petitions, on the basis of such evidence as may
be submitted to it by the petitioners and on the findings of investigations or
surveys made by or for it, or by other governmental agencies, the board shall
establish such projects as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter. Before making a final determination to establish a project or
projects, the board shall hold a hearing, notice of which shall be duly
advertised in the same manner and form, as nearly as may be, as provided in
section 174-17. The department shall assure that adequate water is reserved
for future development and use on Hawaiian home lands that could be served by
the proposed water project. [L 1961, c 166, pt of §3; Supp, §86-15; HRS
§174-16; am L 1987, c 306, §9; am L 1991, c 325, §4]

Law Journals and Reviews

Native Hawaiian Homestead Water Reservation Rights:
Providing Good Living Conditions for Native Hawaiian Homesteaders. 25 UH L.
Rev. 85.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next